Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Generally

§ 13-3-101.
Bond required of officers and employees.

The state banking commissioner may require all active officers and employees of banks to furnish a fidelity bond in duplicate in an amount to be fixed by the state banking commissioner and written by a surety company authorized to do business in Wyoming. One (1) copy of the bond shall be filed with the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 10-102; C.S. 1945, § 35-102; W.S. 1957, § 13-5; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to larceny, see §

6-3-402

.

§ 13-3-102.
Loans to executive officers, directors, principal shareholders or others with ownership interests.

No bank shall loan any of its funds to executive officers, directors or to any person owning or controlling ten percent (10%) or more of the bank’s or its bank holding company’s voting ownership interests, or to any person in which any of the executive officers, directors or owners or controllers are interested except upon the written application of the person and then only with the prior approval of a majority of the board of directors. The approval of the loan, if allowed, shall be made a part of the records of the directors’ meeting.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 45a; R.S. 1931, § 10-136; C.S. 1945, § 35-139; W.S. 1957, § 13-26; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 2001, ch. 73, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to criminal penalties for violation, see §

13-10-106

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of contract between corporations as affected by directors or officers in common, 33 ALR2d 1060.

Construction and application of statutes prohibiting or limiting loans to bank's officers or directors, 49 ALR3d 727.

§ 13-3-103.
Preference to depositors or creditors prohibited; exceptions.

A bank shall not give preference to any depositor or creditor by pledging the assets of the bank as security except that the bank may qualify as depository for United States deposits, postal savings funds or other public funds by deposit of the securities required by law and except as otherwise permitted by this act.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 38; R.S. 1931, § 10-140; Laws 1933, ch. 5, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 35-143; W.S. 1957, § 13-28; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to criminal penalty for granting a preference, see §

13-10-104

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-3-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 36, related to the removal of officers and procedures to correct unsound or unauthorized practices.